District of Columbia statutes.
1-633.01

Authorization of appropriations.

Appropriations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are hereby authorized.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3301, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-634.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-363.1.